Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 6. Open Meetings of Governmental Bodies.

Sec. 44.62.310.
Government meetings public.

All meetings of a governmental body of a public entity of the state are open to the public except as otherwise provided by this section or another provision of law. Attendance and participation at meetings by members of the public or by members of a governmental body may be by teleconferencing. Agency materials that are to be considered at the meeting shall be made available at teleconference locations if practicable. Except when voice votes are authorized, the vote shall be conducted in such a manner that the public may know the vote of each person entitled to vote. The vote at a meeting held by teleconference shall be taken by roll call. This section does not apply to any votes required to be taken to organize a governmental body described in this subsection.

If permitted subjects are to be discussed at a meeting in executive session, the meeting must first be convened as a public meeting and the question of holding an executive session to discuss matters that are listed in (c) of this section shall be determined by a majority vote of the governmental body. The motion to convene in executive session must clearly and with specificity describe the subject of the proposed executive session without defeating the purpose of addressing the subject in private. Subjects may not be considered at the executive session except those mentioned in the motion calling for the executive session unless auxiliary to the main question. Action may not be taken at an executive session, except to give direction to an attorney or labor negotiator regarding the handling of a specific legal matter or pending labor negotiations.

The following subjects may be considered in an executive session:

matters, the immediate knowledge of which would clearly have an adverse effect upon the finances of the public entity;

subjects that tend to prejudice the reputation and character of any person, provided the person may request a public discussion;

matters which by law, municipal charter, or ordinance are required to be confidential;

matters involving consideration of government records that by law are not subject to public disclosure.

This section does not apply to

a governmental body performing a judicial or quasi-judicial function when holding a meeting solely to make a decision in an adjudicatory proceeding;

juries;

parole or pardon boards;

meetings of a hospital medical staff;

meetings of the governmental body or any committee of a hospital when holding a meeting solely to act upon matters of professional qualifications, privileges, or discipline;

staff meetings or other gatherings of the employees of a public entity, including meetings of an employee group established by policy of the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska or held while acting in an advisory capacity to the Board of Regents;

meetings held for the purpose of participating in or attending a gathering of a national, state, or regional organization of which the public entity, governmental body, or member of the governmental body is a member, but only if no action is taken and no business of the governmental body is conducted at the meetings; or

meetings of municipal service area boards established under AS

29.35.450

—

29.35.490

when meeting solely to act on matters that are administrative or managerial in nature.

Reasonable public notice shall be given for all meetings required to be open under this section. The notice must include the date, time, and place of the meeting and if, the meeting is by teleconference, the location of any teleconferencing facilities that will be used. Subject to posting notice of a meeting on the Alaska Online Public Notice System as required by AS

44.62.175(a)

, the notice may be given using print or broadcast media. The notice shall be posted at the principal office of the public entity or, if the public entity has no principal office, at a place designated by the governmental body. The governmental body shall provide notice in a consistent fashion for all its meetings.

Action taken contrary to this section is voidable. A lawsuit to void an action taken in violation of this section must be filed in superior court within 180 days after the date of the action. A member of a governmental body may not be named in an action to enforce this section in the member’s personal capacity. A governmental body that violates or is alleged to have violated this section may cure the violation or alleged violation by holding another meeting in compliance with notice and other requirements of this section and conducting a substantial and public reconsideration of the matters considered at the original meeting. If the court finds that an action is void, the governmental body may discuss and act on the matter at another meeting held in compliance with this section. A court may hold that an action taken at a meeting held in violation of this section is void only if the court finds that, considering all of the circumstances, the public interest in compliance with this section outweighs the harm that would be caused to the public interest and to the public entity by voiding the action. In making this determination, the court shall consider at least the following:

the expense that may be incurred by the public entity, other governmental bodies, and individuals if the action is voided;

the disruption that may be caused to the affairs of the public entity, other governmental bodies, and individuals if the action is voided;

the degree to which the public entity, other governmental bodies, and individuals may be exposed to additional litigation if the action is voided;

the extent to which the governing body, in meetings held in compliance with this section, has previously considered the subject;

the amount of time that has passed since the action was taken;

the degree to which the public entity, other governmental bodies, or individuals have come to rely on the action;

whether and to what extent the governmental body has, before or after the lawsuit was filed to void the action, engaged in or attempted to engage in the public reconsideration of matters originally considered in violation of this section;

the degree to which violations of this section were wilful, flagrant, or obvious;

the degree to which the governing body failed to adhere to the policy under AS

44.62.312(a)

.

Subsection (f) of this section does not apply to a governmental body that has only authority to advise or make recommendations to a public entity and has no authority to establish policies or make decisions for the public entity.

In this section,

“governmental body” means an assembly, council, board, commission, committee, or other similar body of a public entity with the authority to establish policies or make decisions for the public entity or with the authority to advise or make recommendations to the public entity; “governmental body” includes the members of a subcommittee or other subordinate unit of a governmental body if the subordinate unit consists of two or more members;

“meeting” means a gathering of members of a governmental body when

more than three members or a majority of the members, whichever is less, are present, a matter upon which the governmental body is empowered to act is considered by the members collectively, and the governmental body has the authority to establish policies or make decisions for a public entity; or

more than three members or a majority of the members, whichever is less, are present, the gathering is prearranged for the purpose of considering a matter upon which the governmental body is empowered to act, and the governmental body has only authority to advise or make recommendations for a public entity but has no authority to establish policies or make decisions for the public entity;

“public entity” means an entity of the state or of a political subdivision of the state including an agency, a board or commission, the University of Alaska, a public authority or corporation, a municipality, a school district, and other governmental units of the state or a political subdivision of the state; it does not include the court system or the legislative branch of state government.

History.

(§ 1 art VI (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 1969; am §§ 1, 2 ch 98 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 100 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 189 SLA 1976; am §§ 2, 3 ch 54 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 201 SLA 1990; am § 7 ch 74 SLA 1991; am §§ 2 — 8 ch 69 SLA 1994; am § 7 ch 54 SLA 2000; am §§ 1, 2 ch 25 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For provisions related to meetings of legislative bodies, see AS

24.60.037

.

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For administrative matters, see 11 AAC 26, art. 1.

For Alaska medical facility authority, see 15 AAC 118, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective August 23, 2009, added (d)(8); added “more than three members or a majority of the members, whichever is less, are present,” to (h)(2)(B); and made related stylistic changes.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The mental health lands working group is not a public body covered by the Open Meetings Act, and its meetings are not covered by the Open Meetings Act. That working group was not a formally established entity with a specific charge to take specific action or give specific advice, and the activities of the group were not financed by public money. It consisted of individuals, including state department heads, meeting merely to begin settlement discussions to resolve the legal issues in a lawsuit. January 1, 1992, Op. Att’y Gen.

The notice requirements of the Open Meetings Act require that the Museum Collections Advisory Committee publish a schedule of its fixed monthly meetings twice yearly, stating the date, time, and place of the meetings. For unscheduled meetings, the public may be notified by public service announcements on the radio, as long as there is confidence that the announcements will in fact be made; but regardless of the media used, at least three days notice should be given. December 30, 1992, Op. Att’y Gen.

The present practice of allowing boards and commissions to conduct routine business by mail does not violate the Open Meetings Act. It neither constitutes a meeting nor is it motivated by an intent to circumvent the Open Meetings Act. Rather, mail voting is expressly authorized by statute. It also furthers sound policy by reducing both administrative costs and administrative burdens. July 5, 1994 Op. Att’y Gen.

AS

44.62.310(a)

unambiguously provides for teleconference meetings. AS

44.62.310(e)

also requires that all teleconferencing facilities be open to the public and that they be noticed. If undue hardship makes it impossible or impractical for a member to participate from a noticed public teleconferencing site, then the governmental body may allow that member to participate in deliberations and votes of that governmental body by telephone without giving public notice of his or her location. Aug. 21, 1995 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 44.62.312.
State policy regarding meetings.

It is the policy of the state that

the governmental units mentioned in AS

44.62.310(a)

exist to aid in the conduct of the people’s business;

it is the intent of the law that actions of those units be taken openly and that their deliberations be conducted openly;

the people of this state do not yield their sovereignty to the agencies that serve them;

the people, in delegating authority, do not give their public servants the right to decide what is good for the people to know and what is not good for them to know;

the people’s right to remain informed shall be protected so that they may retain control over the instruments they have created;

the use of teleconferencing under this chapter is for the convenience of the parties, the public, and the governmental units conducting the meetings.

AS

44.62.310(c)

and (d) shall be construed narrowly in order to effectuate the policy stated in (a) of this section and to avoid exemptions from open meeting requirements and unnecessary executive sessions.

History.

(§ 3 ch 98 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 54 SLA 1985; am § 9 ch 69 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

Sec. 44.62.319.
Short title.

AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

may be cited as the Open Meetings Act.

History.

(§ 26 ch 58 SLA 2010)

Sec. 44.62.320.
Submittal for legislative review.

History.

[Repealed, § 23 ch 7 SLA 2018.]